Utah statutes.
58-73-601.   Scope of practice for a chiropractic physician.
(1)  A chiropractic physician licensed under this chapter may engage in the
practice of chiropractic as defined in Section 58-73-102 in accordance with
the following standards.
(2)  A chiropractic physician may:
(a)  examine, diagnose, and treat only within the scope of chiropractic as
described in this Subsection (2);
(b)  use x-ray for diagnostic purposes only;
(c)  administer:
(i)  physical agents, including light, heat, cold, water, air, sound,
compression, electricity, and electromagnetic radiation except gamma
radiation; and
(ii)  physical activities and devices, including:
(A)  exercise with and without devices;
(B)  joint mobilization;
(C)  mechanical stimulation;
(D)  postural drainage;
(E)  traction;
(F)  positioning;
(G)  wound debridement, cleansing, and dressing changes;
(H)  splinting;
(I)  training in locomotion and other functional activities with and without
assistance devices; and
(J)  correction of posture, body mechanics, and gait;
(d)  administer the following topically applied medicinal agents, including
steroids, anesthetics, coolants, and analgesics for wound care and for
musculoskeletal treatment, including their use by iontophoresis or
phonophoresis;
(e)  treat pain incident to major or minor surgery, cancer, obstetrics, or
x-ray therapy;
(f)  utilize immobilizing appliances, casts, and supports for support
purposes, but may not set displaced bone fractures;
(g)  inform the patient of possible side effects of medication and recommend
referral to the prescribing practitioner;
(h)  provide instruction in the use of physical measures, activities, and
devices for preventive and therapeutic purposes;
(i)  provide consulting, educational, and other advisory services for the
purposes of reducing the incidence and severity of physical disability,
movement dysfunctions, bodily malfunction, and pain;
(j)  treat a human being to assess, prevent, correct, alleviate, and limit
physical disability, movement dysfunction, bodily malfunction, and pain
resulting from disorders, congenital and aging conditions, injury, and
disease; and
(k)  administer, interpret, and evaluate tests.
(3)  A chiropractic physician may not:
(a)  perform incisive surgery;
(b)  administer drugs or medicines for which an authorized prescription is
required by law except as provided in Subsection (2)(d);
(c)  treat cancer;
(d)  practice obstetrics;
(e)  prescribe or administer x-ray therapy; or
(f)  set displaced fractures.
(4)  A chiropractic physician shall assume responsibility for his
examinations, diagnoses, and treatment.
(5)  Nothing in this section authorizes a chiropractic physician to prescribe,
possess for dispensing, dispense, purchase without a prescription written by a
licensed and authorized practitioner, or administer, except under Subsection
(2)(d), a drug requiring a prescription to dispense, under Title 58, Chapter
37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, or Title 58, Chapter 17b, Pharmacy
Practice Act.
(6)  Only primary health care providers licensed under this title as
osteopathic physicians, physicians and surgeons, naturopaths, and chiropractic
physicians, may diagnose, adjust, manipulate, or therapeutically position the
articulation of the spinal column to the extent permitted by their scopes of
practice.
